District of Columbia statutes.
47-1310

Duties of Assessor — Furnishment of information.

The Assessor of the District of Columbia shall furnish information with respect to taxes, special assessments, and valuations to any person having any interest in the property with respect to which such information is requested.

History

Feb. 28, 1898, 30 Stat. 252, ch. 32, § 8
July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 635, ch. 1358, § 1(8)
June 25, 1938, 52 Stat. 1201, ch. 702, § 8
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1310.
1973 Ed., § 47-1009.

Editor's Notes

Office of Assessor abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-413.